South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3529.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Additional Family Court judges SECTION 1.    Section 63-3-40(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) The General Assembly shall elect a number of family court judges from each judicial circuit as follows: First Circuit    Four Judges Second Circuit    Two Judges Third Circuit    Three Judges Fourth Circuit    Three Judges Fifth Circuit    Four Judges Sixth Circuit    Two Judges Seventh Circuit    Four Judges Eighth Circuit    Three Judges Ninth Circuit    Seven Judges Tenth Circuit    Three Judges Eleventh Circuit    Four Judges Twelfth Circuit    Three Judges Thirteenth Circuit    Six Judges Fourteenth Circuit    Four Judges Fifteenth Circuit    Three Judges Sixteenth Circuit    Three Judges Judicial Screening, funding contingency SECTION 2.    The Judicial Merit Selection Commission shall begin the process of nominating candidates for the judicial offices authorized by the provisions of SECTION 1. The General Assembly then shall elect these judges from the nominees of the commission; except that, the nominating process may not begin until funding for the additional judges is provided in the general appropriations act. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 24th day of April, 2025. Approved the 28th day of April, 2025. __________